Colorado, session 2026A, HB1300.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 32-1-207, amend (4)
as follows:
32-1-207. Compliance - modification - enforcement.
(4) (a) In the case of a health service district, a change in service
by the district is not deemed material unless the change affects the license
or certificate of compliance issued by the department of public health and
environment.
(b) IN THE CASE OF A HEALTH SERVICE DISTRICT, THE ADDITION OR
TERMINATION OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
32-19-102 (2), TO THE SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE DISTRICT IS NOT A
MATERIAL MODIFICATION TO OR DEPARTURE FROM THE DISTRICT'S
APPROVED SERVICE PLAN SO LONG AS A MAJORITY OF THE BOARD OF
-2- 1300

DIRECTORS OF THE DISTRICT AFFIRMATIVELY VOTES TO APPROVE THE
ADDITION OR TERMINATION OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING SERVICES AND ANY
AFFORDABLE HOUSING SERVICES ARE CARRIED OUT IN COORDINATION
WITH LOCAL PUBLIC HOUSING ENTITIES, INCLUDING LOCAL PUBLIC
HOUSING AUTHORITIES, LOCAL HOUSING AGENCIES, AND THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT ENTITY RESPONSIBLE FOR CONDUCTING AN APPLICABLE
REGIONAL OR LOCAL HOUSING NEEDS ASSESSMENT.
(c) A health service district is exempt from subsection (3)(b) and
(3)(c) of this section.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 32-1-1003, amend
(1)(c), (5) introductory portion, and (5)(a); and add (1)(b.5) as follows:
32-1-1003. Health service districts - additional powers.
(1) In addition to the powers specified in section 32-1-1001, the
board of any health service district has any or all of the following powers
for and on behalf of such district:
(b.5) TO PROVIDE AFFORDABLE HOUSING SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 32-19-102 (2);
(c) To draw warrants against health service district funds held by
the county treasurer for the purposes set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of
this subsection (1) SUBSECTIONS (1)(a), (1)(b), AND (1)(b.5) OF THIS
SECTION;
(5) Any health service district that is created pursuant to this
article shall have the power, upon approval by the eligible electors of the
district, to levy and collect a uniform sales tax throughout the entire
geographic area of the district upon every transaction or other incident
with respect to which a sales tax is levied by the state pursuant to the
provisions of article 26 of title 39, C.R.S., excluding the sale of cigarettes,
-3- 1300

subject to the following provisions:
(a) For purposes of this subsection (5), "eligible elector" shall
have HAS the same meaning as set forth in section 32-19-102 (3) SECTION
32-19-102 (5).
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 32-1-1003.5, amend
(5)(a) as follows:
32-1-1003.5. Health assurance districts - additional powers -
legislative declaration - definitions.
(5) Any health assurance district that is created pursuant to this
article 1 shall have the power, upon approval by the eligible electors of
the district, to levy and collect a uniform sales tax throughout the entire
geographic area of the district upon every transaction or other incident
with respect to which a sales tax is levied by the state pursuant to the
provisions of article 26 of title 39, excluding the sale of cigarettes, subject
to the following provisions:
(a) For purposes of this subsection (5), "eligible elector" shall
have HAS the same meaning as set forth in section 32-19-102 (3) SECTION
32-19-102 (5).
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 32-19-102 as
follows:
32-19-102. Definitions.
As used in this article ARTICLE 19, unless the context otherwise
requires:

(1) "AFFORDABLE HOUSING" MEANS HOUSING THAT:
(a) IS CONSTRUCTED, REHABILITATED, OR OTHERWISE SUPPORTED
BY A HEALTH SERVICE DISTRICT;
-4- 1300

(b) MEETS DEMONSTRATED COMMUNITY NEEDS FOR PUBLICLY
FUNDED HOUSING AS IDENTIFIED IN THE COUNTY'S OR MUNICIPALITY'S
MOST RECENT HOUSING NEEDS ASSESSMENT CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO
PART 37 OF ARTICLE 32 OF TITLE 24 OR ANOTHER APPLICABLE REGIONAL
OR LOCAL HOUSING NEEDS ASSESSMENT FOR THE COUNTY OR
MUNICIPALITY IN WHICH THE HEALTH SERVICE DISTRICT IS LOCATED; AND
(c) IF APPLICABLE, IS SUBJECT TO A RECORDED RESTRICTIVE
COVENANT WITH AFFORDABILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR THE DURATION OF
ANY FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PROVIDED FOR THE HOUSING.
(2) "AFFORDABLE HOUSING SERVICES" MEANS THE PLANNING,
FINANCING, ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, OR
REHABILITATION OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING OR THE PROVISION OF RELATED
SUPPORTIVE SERVICES.
(1) (3) "Court" means the district court in any county in which the
petition for organization of the district was originally filed and which
entered the order organizing said district or the district court to which the
file pertaining to the district has been transferred pursuant to section
32-1-303 (1)(b).
(2) (4) "District" means:
(a) A health assurance district created pursuant to this article
ARTICLE 19 to organize, operate, control, direct, manage, contract for,
furnish, or provide, directly or indirectly, health-care services to residents
of the district who are in need of such services; or
(b) A health service district created pursuant to this article
ARTICLE 19 that may establish, maintain, or operate, directly or indirectly
through lease to or from other parties or other arrangement, public
hospitals, convalescent centers, nursing care facilities, intermediate care
-5- 1300

facilities, emergency facilities, community clinics, or other facilities
providing health and personal care services and may organize, own,
operate, control, direct, manage, contract for, or furnish ambulance
service.
(3) (5) "Eligible elector" means a person who, at the designated
time or event, is registered to vote pursuant to the "Uniform Election
Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of title 1. C.R.S.
(4) (6) "Interested party" means a resident or eligible elector of the
district or a municipality located in the district.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 32-19-108, amend
(3) and (4) as follows:
32-19-108. Public hearing on service plan - procedures -
decision - judicial review - modifications - enforcement.
(3) The board of county commissioners of the county in which the
district will be located or the governing body of the municipality in which
the district will be located, whichever is applicable, shall conduct the
hearing pursuant to section 32-1-204 (1.5) and make its decision in
accordance with the requirements of section 32-1-204 (3) and (4). The
decision of the board or governing body, whichever is applicable, is
subject to judicial review in accordance with section 32-1-206; except
that, for purposes of judicial review, "interested party" shall have HAS the
same meaning as set forth in section 32-19-102 (4) SECTION 32-19-102
(6).
(4) Upon final approval by the court for the organization of a
district pursuant to section 32-1-304.5, the district shall conform as much
as possible to the approved service plan, and any material modifications
to the plan shall be approved in accordance with section 32-1-207 (2)
-6- 1300

SECTION 32-1-207 (2) AND (4). Any material departure from the plan may
be enjoined in accordance with section 32-1-207 (3); except that, for
purposes of enforcement of the plan, "interested party" shall have HAS the
same meaning as set forth in section 32-19-102 (4) SECTION 32-19-102
(6).
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 32-19-110, amend
(2) as follows:
32-19-110. Time for holding elections - persons entitled to vote
at district elections.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 32-1-806, any
person who is an eligible elector as defined in section 32-19-102 (3)
SECTION 32-19-102 (5) shall be eligible to vote in an organizational
election or any election conducted by the board of directors for a district.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 32-19-116 as
follows:
32-19-116. Construction of article - local government
authority.
NOTHING IN THIS ARTICLE SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO ALTER THE
AUTHORITY OF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT IN APPLYING AND ENFORCING
APPLICABLE ORDINANCES, DEED RESTRICTIONS, COMMUNITY BENEFIT
AGREEMENTS, DEVELOPMENT AGREEMENTS, OR OTHER AFFORDABLE
HOUSING POLICIES AND STANDARDS.
SECTION 8. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
-7- 1300

state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-8- 1300